Massachusetts, session 194th, H4764.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 138 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by inserting after section 25E¾ the following section:-
Section 25E 7/8. A “successor supplier” shall mean any person or entity who directly or
indirectly acquires the right or obligation to sell an item with a brand name to a wholesaler
licensed in the commonwealth. A successor supplier shall acquire such rights or obligations
subject to section 25E. All sales of a brand name item made to a licensed wholesaler prior to
succession shall be attributed to the successor supplier for the purposes of determining whether 6
months of regular sales exist pursuant to section 25E.
of 1